Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 22 Limitations On Delegates To A Convention For Proposing Amendments

§ 9-22-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Article V application” means a joint resolution passed by the Wyoming legislature on the same subject or containing the same proposed amendment text as two-thirds (2/3) of the other states requiring the United States congress to call an article V convention;

“Article V convention” means a convention for proposing amendments as expressly provided in article V of the United States constitution;

“Delegate” or “alternate” means a legislator selected under W.S. 9-22-102(g) to represent the state of Wyoming at an article V convention;

“Legislative instructions” means instructions given by the state legislature to delegates and alternates before and during an article V convention;

“Unauthorized amendment” means a proposed amendment that is outside the permitted subject matter contained in the article V application or contrary to legislative instructions.

History.

2017 ch. 197, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 197, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 9-22-102.
Limitations of authority for delegates to an article V convention.

No delegate shall have authority to vote to allow consideration of, or to approve, an unauthorized amendment for ratification to the United States constitution.

Any delegate shall be directed to vote for procedures and rules mandating that the convention remain a convention of states where each state is represented by one (1) vote.

Any vote made in violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be null and void, and the delegate making the vote shall be immediately recalled by an official or executive branch committee authorized by a resolution of the legislature and replaced by an alternate as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

Each delegate or alternate shall be required to take the following oath or affirmation: “I do solemnly swear or affirm that to the best of my abilities I will, as a delegate or alternate to an article V convention, uphold the constitution and laws of the United States of America and Wyoming. I will not vote to allow consideration of or to approve any unauthorized amendment proposed for ratification to the United States constitution. I understand and accept any penalties that Wyoming law may impose on me for violating this oath.”

Any delegate who violates the oath contained in subsection (d) of this section shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both. Additionally, any delegate who violates the oath contained in subsection (d) of this section shall be ineligible to serve as a delegate and any certification of the delegate shall be null and void.

The secretary of state shall certify the selection of the delegates in writing to the article V convention and shall provide a copy of the certification to each delegate. No delegate shall have authority to vote or otherwise serve as a delegate at the article V convention without the certification.

The secretary of state shall notify the president of the Wyoming senate and the speaker of the Wyoming house of representatives in writing of the need to assign delegates or alternates to the article V convention. The members of the senate shall elect three (3) members of the senate to serve as delegates, and the members of the house of representatives shall elect three (3) members of the house of representatives to serve as delegates. If a delegate becomes unable or ineligible to serve, the president of the senate or the speaker of the house shall assign an alternate for the delegate who has become unable or ineligible to serve. An alternate delegate assigned under this subsection shall immediately be entitled to represent Wyoming as a delegate in place of the delegate who has become unable or ineligible to serve, and the secretary of state shall immediately provide certification to the new delegate.

The secretary of state shall notify the article V convention and any delegate involved of the revocation of that delegate’s certification should the delegate violate his or her oath to act only within the limits of the authority granted by the state of Wyoming.

The Wyoming attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

2017 ch. 197, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.